Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.540

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Legislative body may amend, adopt, or reject adopting ordinance—When official code.

After the hearing, the legislative body may amend, adopt, or reject the adopting ordinance in the same manner in which it is empowered to act in the case of other ordinances. Upon the enactment of such adopting ordinance, the codification shall be the official code of ordinances of the city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.540. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 5.]